Hawaii statutes.
[§6E-38] National statuary hall; King
Kamehameha I. King Kamehameha I is selected as one of the two illustrious,
deceased persons whose statue shall be furnished by the State of Hawaii for
placement in the national statuary hall in the national capitol pursuant to
Title 40 United States Code 187. [L 1976, c 104, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next